District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1958

Days of leave with pay defined.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 20, 1950, 64 Stat. 1114, ch. 1141, § 1
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78,§ 19, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1026.
1973 Ed., § 31-694a.